Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Telephone Cooperatives

279.310.
Definitions for KRS 279.320 to 279.600.

As used in KRS

279.320

to

279.600

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cooperative” means any corporation organized under KRS

279.320

to

279.600

or which becomes subject to those sections in the manner provided therein;

“Person” means any natural person, firm, association, corporation, business trust, or partnership;

As used in this chapter, the term “telephone service” shall include in its meaning communications services of all kinds allowed to any other telephone utility, authorized by regulatory agency and with some unregulated, that being the transmission of voice, data, sounds, signals, pictures, writing, or signs of all kinds, by use of wire, radio, light, electromagnetic impulse, broadband (wideband) spectrum, or any other transmission mode and facility used in rendition of such services; but shall not include in their meaning message telegram service, or radio broadcasting services or facilities within the meaning of Section 153(O) of the Federal Communications Act of 1934, as amended;

“Acquire” means to construct, purchase, obtain by lease, devise, gift, or eminent domain, or to obtain by any other lawful means;

“Board” means the board of trustees of a corporation formed under KRS

279.320

to

279.600

;

“Federal agency” means and includes the United States, the President of the United States, and all federal authorities, instrumentalities, and agencies in the ordinary sense;

“Improve” means to construct, reconstruct, extend, enlarge, alter, better, or repair;

“Member” means and includes each person signing the articles of incorporation of a corporation formed under KRS

279.320

to

279.600

, each person later admitted to membership according to law or according to the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, and each common stockholder in a corporation, having capital stock, organized under KRS

279.320

to

279.600

;

“Obligations” means and includes negotiable bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates or receipts, and all other evidences of indebtedness either issued or the payment thereof assumed by a corporation organized under KRS

279.320

to

279.600

;

“System” means and includes any plant, works, facilities, and properties, and all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, used or useful in the operation and maintenance of telephone communication service;

“Rural area” shall be deemed to mean any area of this state not included within the boundaries of any incorporated or unincorporated city or of a consolidated local government, having a population in excess of fifteen hundred (1,500) inhabitants;

“Telephone company” means any natural person, firm, association, corporation, or partnership owning, leasing, or operating any line, facility, or system used in the furnishing of telephone service within this state;

“Business entity” means a domestic and foreign limited liability company, corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, business or statutory trust, and not-for-profit unincorporated association;

“Corporation” means a profit or nonprofit corporation formed under the laws of any state or a foreign country;

“Name of record with the Secretary of State” means any real, fictitious, reserved, registered, or assumed name of a business entity; and

“Real name” shall have the meaning set forth in KRS

365.015

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, §
1, effective March 25, 1950; 1980, ch. 175, §
1, effective July 15, 1980; 2002, ch. 346, §
224, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 137, §
134, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
134, effective July 15, 2010.

279.320.
Who may incorporate — Purposes of incorporation.

Any five (5) or more natural persons, a majority of whom are citizens of Kentucky, may, by executing, filing and recording articles of incorporation as provided in KRS

279.330

and

279.350

, form a nonprofit cooperative corporation to promote and encourage the fullest possible use of telephone service in this state by making facilities for such service available to persons in rural areas of the state at the lowest cost consistent with sound business methods and prudent management.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 2.

279.330.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation of a corporation formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall be entitled “Articles of Incorporation of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Corporation” and the title may include the word “Cooperative.” The articles shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

, recite that they are executed pursuant to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

and shall state:

The name of the corporation.

The address of its principal office.

The names and addresses of the incorporators.

The names and addresses of its trustees.

A general description of the territory in which it proposes to operate.

If a cooperative desires to issue nonvoting shares of stock, its articles of incorporation, in addition to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, shall state:

The total number of such shares of stock which may be issued and the par value of each share;

The fixed or maximum rate of dividends on the par value of such shares of stock, in either case not exceeding four percent (4%) per annum, and whether dividends shall be cumulative or noncumulative;

Whether such shares of stock may be issued to members only or to members and nonmembers;

The maximum number of such shares of stock which may be owned by any person;

The terms and conditions on which such shares of stock may be transferred, redeemed or retired.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 3; 1972, ch. 136, § 1; 2010, ch. 151, § 84, effective January 1, 2011.

279.340.
Name.

The name of a cooperative shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

unless, in an affidavit made by its president or vice president, and filed with the Secretary of State, or in an affidavit made by a person signing articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger or conversion, which relate to such cooperative, and filed, together with any such articles, with the Secretary of State, it shall appear that the cooperative desires to do business in another state and is or would be precluded therefrom by reason of the inclusion of such words or either thereof in its name.

This section shall not apply to any corporation which becomes subject to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

by complying with the provisions of KRS

279.470

, which does business in this state pursuant to KRS

279.570

and which elects to retain a corporate name which does not comply with this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, §
4, effective March 25, 1950; 1964, ch. 14, §
1; 1972, ch. 136, §
2, effective June 16, 1972; 2007, ch. 137, §
135, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
135, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact., and amend., ch. 151, §
85, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

The effect of the 1964 amendment to this section was to permit a telephone cooperative to use the word “telecommunications” in its name as an alternative to the word “telephone” and to retain the requirement that the word “cooperative” appear in the corporate name.

OAG 69-458

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

279.350.
Filing and approval of articles — When corporation may begin business.

The incorporators shall execute four (4) copies of the articles of incorporation that satisfy KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

, and each incorporator shall acknowledge each copy before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds. They shall then deliver for filing the four (4) copies, together with the certificate of acknowledgment, to the Secretary of State for filing.

As soon as the Secretary of State has filed the articles of incorporation, the corporation shall be a body politic and corporate and may transact business in its corporate name.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 5; 2010, ch. 151, § 86, effective January 1, 2011.

279.360.
General powers of rural telephone cooperative corporations.

Each corporation organized under the provisions of KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall have power:

To furnish, improve and expand telephone service in rural areas to its members, to governmental agencies and political subdivisions, and to other persons not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the number of its members, provided, however, that, without regard to said ten percent (10%) limitation, telephone service may be made available by a cooperative through interconnection of facilities to any number of subscribers of other telephone systems, and through pay stations to any number of users; and provided, further, that a cooperative which acquires existing telephone facilities in rural areas may continue service to persons, not in excess of forty percent (40%) of the number of its members, who are already receiving service from such facilities, without requiring such persons to become members, but such persons may become members upon such terms as may be prescribed in the bylaws; and provided, further, that no cooperative shall (a) construct or operate any line, facility or system in any rural area being furnished telephone service by any telephone company or other cooperative unless the Public Service Commission shall determine, after hearing on reasonable notice to all interested parties, that any such telephone company or other cooperative is unwilling or unable to furnish reasonably adequate telephone service in such area, or (b) furnish any telephone service in any area proposed to be served by any telephone company, which may be found to be ready, willing and able to serve, within such period of time as may, after hearing, be determined to be reasonable by the Public Service Commission;

To construct, purchase, lease as lessee, or otherwise acquire, and to improve, expand, install, equip, maintain, and operate, and to sell, assign, convey, lease as lessor, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber, telephone lines, facilities or systems, lands, buildings, structures, plants and equipment, exchanges, and any other real or personal property, tangible or intangible, which shall be deemed necessary, convenient or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized; provided, that no cooperative shall construct, purchase, lease as lessee, take, receive, or otherwise acquire, improve, expand, install, equip, maintain, or operate any telephone lines, facilities or system, lands, buildings, structures, plants and equipment, exchanges, or any other real or personal property, tangible or intangible, within the boundaries of any incorporated or unincorporated city, town, village, or borough within this state having a population in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) inhabitants, unless said procedures or any of them are determined by the administrator of the rural electrification administration to be necessary in order to furnish or improve telephone service in rural areas, and unless said determination by the administrator of the rural electrification administration, after proper hearing on reasonable notice to all interested parties, be approved by the Public Service Commission of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. In case of such a determination by the administrator of the rural electrification administration as aforesaid with approval by the Kentucky Public Service Commission, nothing contained in this section or elsewhere provided in KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall deprive any corporation organized under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

or foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to KRS 279.310 to 279.600, of the power to improve, expand, construct, acquire and operate telephone lines, facilities, or systems without regard to their geographical location;

To connect and interconnect its telephone lines, facilities or systems with other telephone lines, facilities or systems;

To make its facilities available to persons furnishing telephone service within or without this state;

To purchase, lease as lessee, or otherwise acquire, and to use, and exercise and to sell, assign, convey, mortgage, pledge or otherwise dispose of or encumber, franchises, rights, privileges, licenses and easements;

To issue membership certificates and nonvoting shares of stock as hereinafter provided;

To borrow money and otherwise contract indebtedness, and to issue or guarantee notes, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness, and to secure the payment thereof by mortgage, pledge, or deed of trust of, or any other encumbrance upon, any or all of its then owned or after-acquired real or personal property, assets, franchises, or revenues;

To construct, maintain and operate telephone lines along, upon, under and across publicly owned lands and public thoroughfares, including, without limitation, all roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges and causeways;

To exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by the laws of this state for the exercise of such power by other corporations constructing or operating telephone lines, facilities or systems;

To become a member of other cooperatives or corporations or to own stock therein;

To conduct its business and exercise its powers within or without this state;

To adopt, amend and repeal bylaws;

To make any and all contracts necessary, convenient or appropriate for the full exercise of the powers herein granted;

To exercise all other powers authorized by KRS Chapter 271B; and

To do and perform any other lawful acts and things, and to have and exercise any other powers which may be necessary, convenient or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 6; 1972, ch. 274, § 156.

279.370.
Bylaws — Adoption and contents.

The incorporators of each corporation organized under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall adopt for its management bylaws not inconsistent with the powers granted by KRS

279.310

to

279.600

. The written consent of a majority of the incorporators, evidenced by their signatures to the bylaws adopted, shall be necessary to the adoption of bylaws. The bylaws may be amended by a majority vote of the board of trustees.

The bylaws may provide for any or all of the following matters:

The time, place and manner of calling and conducting meetings of the members.

The number of members constituting a quorum.

The right of members to vote by mail, and the conditions, manner, form and effect of such votes.

The number of trustees constituting a quorum.

The qualifications, compensation, powers, duties and terms of office of trustees and officers, the time of their election and the manner of giving notice thereof.

An executive committee and the allotment to that committee of any or all of the functions and powers of the board of trustees, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

The amount of entrance, organization and membership fees, if any, the manner of collecting them and the purposes for which they may be used.

The qualifications of members of the corporation and the conditions precedent to membership; the time and manner of permitting members to withdraw; the manner of assignment or transfer of the interest of a member; the conditions upon which and the time when membership of any member shall cease; the suspension of the rights of a member when he ceases to be eligible to membership in the corporation; the manner and effect of the expulsion of a member; the manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the corporation upon the death or withdrawal of a member or upon his expulsion or forfeiture of membership, or, at the option of the corporation, the purchase of the member’s interest at a price fixed by appraisal by the board. The bylaws may provide that in case of the forced withdrawal or expulsion of a member the board shall equitably appraise his property interest in the corporation and shall at its option fix the amount thereof in money or other property, which shall be paid to him within one (1) year after his expulsion or withdrawal.

Penalties for violation of the bylaws.

Any other matter relating to the operation or management of the corporation and not inconsistent with law or with the articles of incorporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 7.

279.380.
Board of trustees — Officers.

The business of a cooperative shall be managed by a board of not less than five (5) trustees, each of whom shall be a member of the cooperative, or of another cooperative which is a member thereof. The bylaws shall prescribe the number of trustees, their qualifications, other than those prescribed in this section, the manner of holding meetings of the board of trustees and of electing successors to trustees who shall resign, die, or otherwise be incapable of acting. The bylaws may also provide for the removal of trustees from office and for the election of their successors. Trustees shall not receive any salaries for their services as trustees and, except in emergencies, shall not receive any salaries for their services in any other capacity without the approval of the members. The bylaws may, however, prescribe a fixed fee for attendance at each meeting of the board of trustees and may provide for reimbursement of actual expenses of attendance.

The trustees of a cooperative named in any articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger, conversion or combined consolidation and conversion shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the members and until their successors are elected and qualify. At each annual meeting or, in case of failure to hold the annual meeting as specified in the bylaws, at a special meeting called for that purpose, the members shall elect trustees to hold office until the next annual meeting of the members, except as otherwise provided in KRS

279.310

to

279.600

. The trustees so elected shall be elected in a manner to insure secrecy and anonymity of ballots cast provided the result of such election is determined by ballot vote. Each trustee shall hold office for the term for which he is elected and until his successor is elected and qualifies.

Instead of electing all the trustees annually, the bylaws may provide that one-third (1/3) of them, or a number as near thereto as possible, shall be elected annually for a term of three (3) years.

A majority of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum.

The board of trustees may exercise all of the powers of a cooperative not conferred upon the members by KRS

279.310

to

279.600

, or its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The officers of a cooperative shall consist of a president, vice president, secretary and treasurer, who shall be elected annually by and from the board of trustees. When a person holding any such office ceases to be a trustee he shall cease to hold such office. The office of secretary and of treasurer may be held by the same person. The board of trustees may also elect or appoint such other officers, agents, or employees as it deems necessary or advisable and shall prescribe their powers and duties. Any officer may be removed from office and his successor elected in the manner prescribed in the bylaws.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 8; 1964, ch. 14, § 2; 1982, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

279.390.
Members and shareholders — Requirements for membership.

Each incorporator of a cooperative shall be a member thereof but no other person may become a member thereof unless such other person agrees to use telephone service furnished by the cooperative when it is made available through its facilities. Membership in a cooperative shall be evidenced by a certificate of membership which shall not be transferable, except as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications and limitations in respect of membership, provided that ownership of shares of stock, if any are authorized, shall not be a condition of membership in the cooperative.

In case the issuance of shares of stock is provided for in the articles of incorporation, ownership thereof shall be evidenced by share certificates. No share of stock shall be issued except for cash, or for property at its fair value, in an amount equal to the par value of such share of stock.

Membership and share certificates shall contain such provisions, consistent with KRS

279.310

to

279.600

and the articles of incorporation of the cooperative, as shall be prescribed by its bylaws.

No member or shareholder shall be liable or responsible for any debts of the cooperative and the property of the members and shareholders shall not be subject to execution therefor except as the member or shareholder may become personally liable by reason of his or her own acts or conduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 9; 2010, ch. 133, § 48, effective July 15, 2010.

279.400.
Meeting of members — Waiver of notice.

An annual meeting of the members of a cooperative shall be held at such time and place as shall be provided in the bylaws.

Special meetings of the members may be called by the president, by the board of trustees, by any three (3) trustees, or by not less than two hundred (200) members or ten percent (10%) of all members, whichever shall be the lesser.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

279.310

to

279.600

, written or printed notice stating the time and place of each meeting of the members and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given to each member, either personally or by mail not less than ten (10) days nor more than twenty-five (25) days before the date of the meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the United States mail with postage prepaid addressed to the member at his address as it appears on the records of the cooperative.

Unless the bylaws prescribe the presence of a greater percentage or number of the members for a quorum, a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the members of a cooperative having not more than five hundred (500) members, shall be ten percentum (10%) of all members, present in person, and of a cooperative having more than five hundred (500) members, shall be fifty (50) members or one percentum (1%) of all members, whichever is greater, present in person. If less than a quorum is present at any meeting, a majority of those present in person may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice.

Each member shall be entitled to one (1) vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of the members. Voting shall be in person, but, if the bylaws so provide, may also be by mail.

Any person entitled to notice of a meeting may waive such notice in writing either before or after such meeting. If any such person shall attend such meeting, such attendance shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, unless such person participates therein solely to object to the transaction of any business because the meeting has not been legally called or convened.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 10; 1972, ch. 32, § 1.

279.410.
Amendment of articles of incorporation.

A cooperative may amend its articles of incorporation by complying with the following requirements, provided, however, that a change of location of principal office may be effected in the manner set forth in KRS

279.420

. The proposed amendment shall be presented to a meeting of the members, the notice of which shall set forth or have attached thereto the proposed amendment. If the proposed amendment, with any changes, is approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of those members voting thereon at such meeting, articles of amendment shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its president or vice president and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of amendment shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this section and shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office; and

The amendment to its articles of incorporation.

The president or vice president executing such articles of amendment shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section in respect of the amendment set forth in such articles were duly complied with.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 11.

279.420.
Change of location of principal offices.

A cooperative may, upon authorization of its board of trustees or its members, change the location of its principal office by filing a statement of change in accordance with KRS

14A.5-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 12; 2010, ch. 151, § 87, effective January 1, 2011.

279.430.
Common and preferred stock — Ownership and transfer.

Only a member of a corporation organized under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

may own its common stock, and neither the common stock in any such corporation or any interest therein shall be transferable or assignable, except as security for a loan from the federal government, either by act of the parties or by operation of law, to any person who is not eligible to be a member of the corporation.

No corporation formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall issue common stock to a member until it has been fully paid for, but the promissory notes of a member may be accepted by the corporation as full or partial payment. The corporation shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but such retention as security shall not affect the member’s right to vote.

No person, other than a corporation formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

, shall at any one (1) time own more than five percent (5%) of the outstanding common stock of any corporation formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

.

No corporation formed under KRS

279.310

to

279.600

shall pay dividends on either its common stock or its preferred stock in an amount greater than four percent (4%) per annum on each class of stock.

Any such corporation may at any time, as specified in its bylaws, except when the debts of the corporation exceed fifty percent (50%) of its assets, buy in or purchase its common stock at the book value thereof, as conclusively determined by its board of directors, and pay for it in cash within one (1) year thereafter.

Preferred stock may be owned by and transferred to any person, and may be made redeemable and retirable by the corporation on such terms and conditions as are provided for in the articles of incorporation and printed on the face of each certificate. Ownership of preferred stock shall not confer on the holder any right to vote.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 13.

279.440.
Consolidation.

Any two (2) or more cooperatives (each of which is hereinafter designated a “consolidating cooperative”), may consolidate into a new cooperative (hereinafter designated the “new cooperative”), by complying with the following requirements of this section.

The proposition for the consolidation of the consolidating cooperative into the new cooperative and proposed articles of consolidation to give effect thereto shall be submitted to a meeting of the members of each consolidating cooperative, the notice of which shall have attached thereto a copy of the proposed articles of consolidation.

If the proposed consolidation and the proposed articles of consolidation with any amendments are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of those members of each consolidating cooperative voting thereon at each such meeting, articles of consolidation in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each consolidating cooperative by its president or vice president and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of consolidation shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this section and shall state:

The name of each consolidating cooperative and the address of its principal office;

The name of the new cooperative and the address of its principal office;

A statement that each consolidating cooperative agrees to the consolidation;

The names and addresses of the trustees of the new cooperative; and

The terms and conditions of the consolidation and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner in which members and shareholders, if any, of the consolidating cooperative may or shall become members and shareholders, respectively, of the new cooperative; and may contain any provisions not inconsistent with KRS

279.310

to

279.600

deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the new cooperative.

The president or vice president of each consolidating cooperative executing such articles of consolidation shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section in respect of such articles were duly complied with by such cooperative.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 14.

279.450.
Merger.

Any one (1) or more cooperatives (each of which is hereinafter designated a “merging cooperative”) may merge into another cooperative (hereinafter designated the “surviving cooperative”), by complying with the following requirements of this section.

The proposition for the merger of the merging cooperatives into the surviving cooperative and proposed articles of merger to give effect thereto shall be submitted to a meeting of the members of each merging cooperative and of the surviving cooperative, the notice of which shall have attached thereto a copy of the proposed articles of merger.

If the proposed merger and the proposed articles of merger, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of those members of each cooperative voting thereon at each such meeting, articles of merger in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each such cooperative by its president or vice president and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of merger shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this section and shall state:

The name of each merging cooperative and the address of its principal office;

The name of the surviving cooperative and the address of its principal office;

A statement that each merging cooperative and the surviving cooperative agree to the merger;

The names and addresses of the trustees of the surviving cooperative; and

The terms and conditions of the merger and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner in which members, if any, of the merging cooperative may or shall become members and shareholders, respectively, of the surviving cooperative, and may contain any provisions not inconsistent with KRS

279.310

to

279.600

deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the surviving cooperative.

The president or vice president of each cooperative executing such articles of merger shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section in respect of such articles were duly complied with by such cooperative.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 15.

279.460.
Effect of consolidation or merger.

In the case of a consolidation the existence of the consolidating cooperatives shall cease and the articles of consolidation shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new cooperative; and in the case of a merger the separate existence of the merging cooperative shall cease and the articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes therein are provided for in the articles of merger.

All the rights, privileges, immunities and franchises and all property, real and personal, including without limitation applications for membership, all debts due on whatever account and all other choses in action, of each of the consolidating or merging cooperatives shall be deemed to be transferred to and vested in the new or surviving cooperative without further act or deed.

The new or surviving cooperative shall be responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the consolidating or merging cooperatives and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any of the consolidating or merging cooperatives may be prosecuted as if the consolidation or merger had not taken place, but the new or surviving cooperative may be substituted in its place.

Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any of such cooperatives shall be impaired by such consolidation or merger.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 16.

279.470.
Conversion and combined consolidation and conversion of existing corporations.

Any corporation organized under the laws of this state and furnishing or having the corporate power to furnish telephone service may be converted into a cooperative by complying with the following requirements and shall thereupon become subject to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

with the same effect as if originally organized under those sections:

The proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative and proposed articles of conversion to give effect thereto shall be submitted to a meeting of the members or stockholders of such corporation, or in case of a corporation having no members or stockholders, to a meeting of the incorporators of such corporation, the notice of which shall have attached thereto a copy of the proposed articles of conversion.

If the proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative and the proposed articles of conversion, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of those members of such corporation voting thereon at such meeting, or, if such corporation is a stock corporation, by the affirmative vote of the holders of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of those shares of the capital stock of such corporation represented at such meeting and voting thereon, or, in the case of a corporation having no members and no shares of its capital stock outstanding, by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of its incorporators, articles of conversion in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of such corporation by its president or vice president and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of conversion shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this section and shall state:

The name of the corporation and the address of its principal office prior to its conversion into a cooperative;

The statute or statutes under which it was organized;

A statement that such corporation elected to become a cooperative, nonprofit corporation subject to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

;

Its name as a cooperative;

The address of the principal office of the cooperative;

The names and addresses of the trustees of the cooperative; and

The manner in which members, stockholders or incorporators of such corporation may or shall become members of the cooperative; and may contain any provisions not inconsistent with KRS 279.310 to 279.600 deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the cooperative, including provisions for the issuance of nonvoting shares of stock as provided for in KRS

279.330

. If the articles of conversion shall make provision for the issuance of such shares of stock, they shall also state the manner in which members, stockholders or incorporators of such corporation may or shall become shareholders of the cooperative. The president or vice president executing such articles of conversion shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section were duly complied with in respect of such articles. The articles of conversion shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the cooperative.

Any two (2) or more corporations organized under the laws of this state and furnishing or having the corporate power to furnish telephone service may, if otherwise permitted to consolidate by the laws of this state, consolidate into a cooperative subject to KRS

279.310

to

279.600

, with the same effect as if originally organized under those sections, by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the consolidation into a cooperative and the proposed articles of consolidation and conversion, with any amendments, shall be approved by each consolidating corporation in accordance with the statute or statutes under which it was organized and the provisions of subsection (1) of this section;

The articles of consolidation and conversion in the form approved shall be executed, acknowledged and sealed in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section and in the statute or statutes under which the consolidating corporations were organized. The articles of consolidation and conversion shall state that they are executed pursuant to this section and such statute or statutes, that each consolidating corporation elects that the new corporation shall be a cooperative, and in addition shall contain all other information required by such statute or statutes and by paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section; may contain any provisions not inconsistent with KRS

279.310

to

279.600

deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the cooperative. The president or vice president executing such articles of consolidation and conversion shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section and of the statute or statutes under which the consolidating corporations were organized were duly complied with in respect of such articles. The articles of consolidation and conversion shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the cooperative and shall be filed both in accordance with the provisions of KRS 279.310 to 279.600 and of the statute or statutes under which the consolidating corporations were organized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 147, § 17.